Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1986 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1986, 1994, 2004, 2012, and 2020 to make other minor word changes under
AS

01.05.031

.

Collateral references. —

Loss of liquor license as compensable in condemnation proceeding. 58 ALR3d 581.

Liquor license as subject to execution or attachment. 40 ALR4th 927.

Construction and application of § 5301(c) of Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 USCS § 5301(c)), punishing sellers of liquor for adulteration or alteration of liquor, or for possession of such adulterated or altered liquor. 23 ALR Fed. 925.